src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_EED_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - gayéed - ENGLISH : # CLASS_EED

     gayéed+V+Sg+Impv: gayéed
     gayéed+V+Imm+Pres: gayéedga
     gayéed+V+Interr+Simp+Pres: gayéed
     gayéed+V+Simp+Pres: gayéedang
     gayéed+V+Dir+Past: gayéedan
     gayéed+V+Interr+Past: gayéedaa
     gayéed+V+Indir+Past: gayéedaan
     gayéed+V+Rel: gayéeds
     gayéed+V+Rel+Evid: gayéedaas
     gayéed+V+NonFact: gayéedang
     gayéed+V+Past+NonFact: gayéedaa.ang
     gayéed+V+Interr+Pres+Hab: gayéedang
     gayéed+V+Pres+Hab: gayéedanggang
     gayéed+V+Pres+Hab+NonFact: gayéedangang
     gayéed+V+Dir+Past+Hab: gayéediinii
     gayéed+V+Interr+Past+Hab: gayéedaangaa
     gayéed+V+Indir+Past+Hab: gayéedaangaan
     gayéed+V+Interr+Fut+Long: gayéedäsaa
     gayéed+V+Interr+Fut+Short: gayéedäs
     gayéed+V+Simp+Fut: gayéedäsaang
     gayéed+V+Imm+Fut: gayéedäsga
     gayéed+V+Rel+Fut: gayéedäsaas
     gayéed+V+Fut+NonFact: gayéedäsaa.ang
     gayéed+V+Interr+Near+Fut: gayéedang k̲asaʼáa
     gayéed+V+Near+Fut: gayéedang k̲asaʼáang
     gayéed+V+Interr+VNear+Fut: gayéedang k̲asaasdláa
     gayéed+V+VNear+Fut: gayéedang k̲asaasdláang
     gayéed+V+Bias+Imm+Pres: gayéedʼuuj
     gayéed+V+Bias+Simp+Pres: gayéedʼuujang
     gayéed+V+Res: gayéedäsaaʼuujang
     gayéed+V+Bias+Interr+Pres: gayéedʼus
     gayéed+V+Bias+Interr+Past: gayéedʼujaa
     gayéed+V+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: gayéedʼuujaangaa
     gayéed+V+Bias+Interr+Fut: gayéedäsaaʼus
     gayéed+V+Cert+Pres: gayéedʼahlanggang
     gayéed+V+Cert+Past: gayéedʼahlanggan
     gayéed+V+Cert+Past+Hab: gayéedʼahlanggiinii
     gayéed+V+Cert+Fut: gayéedäsaaʼahlans
     gayéed+V+Cert+Rel: gayéedʼahlans
     gayéed+V+Ints+Past: gayéedaaʼahlang
     gayéed+V+Cont: gayéedaaʼahlanggaa
     gayéed+V+Ctfact+Pres: gayéedaaʼahlanggang
     gayéed+V+Rflx: gayéedʼahl
     gayéed+V+Fut+Rflx+Interr: gayéedäseehl
     gayéed+V+Pl+Impv: gayéedʼuu
     gayéed+V+3pl+Imm+Pres: gayéedʼwaa
     gayéed+V+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: gayéedʼwaa
     gayéed+V+3pl+Simp+Pres: gayéedʼwaang
     gayéed+V+3pl+Dir+Past: gayéedʼwägan
     gayéed+V+3pl+Interr+Past: gayéedʼaawaa
     gayéed+V+3pl+Indir+Past: gayéedʼaawaan
     gayéed+V+3pl+Rel: gayéedʼwaas
     gayéed+V+3pl+Rel+Evid: gayéedʼaawaas
     gayéed+V+3pl+NonFact: gayéedʼwaa.ang
     gayéed+V+3pl+Past+NonFact: gayéedʼaawaa.ang
     gayéed+V+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: gayéedangʼwaa
     gayéed+V+3pl+Pres+Hab: gayéedangʼwaang
     gayéed+V+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: gayéedangʼwaa.ang
     gayéed+V+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: gayéedʼwägiinii
     gayéed+V+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: gayéedʼwägaangaa
     gayéed+V+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: gayéedʼwägaangaan
     gayéed+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: gayéedʼwaaäsaa
     gayéed+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: gayéedʼwaaäs
     gayéed+V+3pl+Simp+Fut: gayéedʼwaaäsaang
     gayéed+V+3pl+Imm+Fut: gayéedʼwaaäsga
     gayéed+V+3pl+Rel+Fut: gayéedʼwaaäsaas
     gayéed+V+3pl+Fut+NonFact: gayéedʼwaaäsaa.ang
     gayéed+V+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: gayéedʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáa
     gayéed+V+3pl+Near+Fut: gayéedʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáang
     gayéed+V+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: gayéedʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     gayéed+V+3pl+VNear+Fut: gayéedʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     gayéed+V+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: gayéedʼwaaʼuuj
     gayéed+V+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: gayéedʼwaaʼuujang
     gayéed+V+3pl+Res: gayéedʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     gayéed+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: gayéedʼwaaʼus
     gayéed+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: gayéedʼwaaʼujaa
     gayéed+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: gayéedʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     gayéed+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: gayéedʼwaaäsaaʼus
     gayéed+V+3pl+Cert+Pres: gayéedʼwaaʼahlanggang
     gayéed+V+3pl+Cert+Past: gayéedʼwaaʼahlanggan
     gayéed+V+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: gayéedʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     gayéed+V+3pl+Cert+Fut: gayéedʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     gayéed+V+3pl+Cert+Rel: gayéedʼwaaʼahlans
     gayéed+V+3pl+Ints+Past: gayéedʼaawaaʼahlang
     gayéed+V+3pl+Cont: gayéedʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     gayéed+V+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: gayéedʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     gayéed+V+3pl+Rflx: gayéedʼwaaʼahl
     gayéed+V+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: gayéedʼwaaäseehl
     gayéed+V+Neg+Sg+Impv: gayéedʼang
     gayéed+V+Neg+Imm+Pres: gayéedʼangga
     gayéed+V+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres: gayéedʼang
     gayéed+V+Neg+Simp+Pres: gayéedʼanggang
     gayéed+V+Neg+Dir+Past: gayéedʼanggan
     gayéed+V+Neg+Interr+Past: gayéedʼaangaa
     gayéed+V+Neg+Indir+Past: gayéedʼaangaan
     gayéed+V+Neg+Rel: gayéedʼans
     gayéed+V+Neg+Rel+Evid: gayéedʼaangaas
     gayéed+V+Neg+NonFact: gayéedʼangang
     gayéed+V+Neg+Past+NonFact: gayéedʼaangaa.ang
     gayéed+V+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab: gayéedʼanggang
     gayéed+V+Neg+Pres+Hab: gayéedangʼanggang
     gayéed+V+Neg+Pres+Hab+NonFact: gayéedangʼangang
     gayéed+V+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab: gayéedʼanggiinii
     gayéed+V+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab: gayéedʼanggaangaa
     gayéed+V+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab: gayéedʼanggaangaan
     gayéed+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long: gayéedʼangäsaa
     gayéed+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short: gayéedʼangäs
     gayéed+V+Neg+Simp+Fut: gayéedʼangäsaang
     gayéed+V+Neg+Imm+Fut: gayéedʼangäsga
     gayéed+V+Neg+Rel+Fut: gayéedʼangäsaas
     gayéed+V+Neg+Fut+NonFact: gayéedʼangäsaa.ang
     gayéed+V+Neg+Interr+Near+Fut: gayéedang k̲asaaʼáng
     gayéed+V+Neg+Near+Fut: gayéedang k̲asaaʼánggang
     gayéed+V+Neg+Interr+VNear+Fut: gayéedang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     gayéed+V+Neg+VNear+Fut: gayéedang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     gayéed+V+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres: gayéedʼangʼuuj
     gayéed+V+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres: gayéedʼangʼuujang
     gayéed+V+Neg+Res: gayéedʼangäsaaʼuujang
     gayéed+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres: gayéedʼangʼus
     gayéed+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past: gayéedʼangʼujaa
     gayéed+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: gayéedʼangʼuujaangaa
     gayéed+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut: gayéedʼangäsaaʼus
     gayéed+V+Neg+Cert+Pres: gayéedʼaangʼahlanggang
     gayéed+V+Neg+Cert+Past: gayéedʼaangʼahlanggan
     gayéed+V+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab: gayéedʼaangʼahlanggiinii
     gayéed+V+Neg+Cert+Fut: gayéedʼangäsaaʼahlans
     gayéed+V+Neg+Cert+Rel: gayéedʼaangʼahlans
     gayéed+V+Neg+Ints+Past: gayéedʼaangaaʼahlang
     gayéed+V+Neg+Cont: gayéedʼaangaaʼahlanggaa
     gayéed+V+Neg+Ctfact+Pres: gayéedʼaangaaʼahlanggang
     gayéed+V+Neg+Rflx: gayéedʼaangʼahl
     gayéed+V+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr: gayéedʼangäseehl
     gayéed+V+Neg+Pl+Impv: gayéedʼangʼuu
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres: gayéedʼangʼwaa
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: gayéedʼangʼwaa
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres: gayéedʼangʼwaang
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past: gayéedʼangʼwägan
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past: gayéedʼangʼaawaa
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past: gayéedʼangʼaawaan
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Rel: gayéedʼangʼwaas
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid: gayéedʼangʼaawaas
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+NonFact: gayéedʼangʼwaa.ang
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact: gayéedʼangʼaawaa.ang
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: gayéedangʼangʼwaa
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab: gayéedangʼangʼwaang
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: gayéedangʼangʼwaa.ang
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: gayéedʼangʼwägiinii
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: gayéedʼangʼwägaangaa
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: gayéedʼangʼwägaangaan
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: gayéedʼangʼwaaäsaa
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: gayéedʼangʼwaaäs
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut: gayéedʼangʼwaaäsaang
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut: gayéedʼangʼwaaäsga
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut: gayéedʼangʼwaaäsaas
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact: gayéedʼangʼwaaäsaa.ang
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: gayéedʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼáng
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut: gayéedʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼánggang
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: gayéedʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut: gayéedʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: gayéedʼangʼwaaʼuuj
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: gayéedʼangʼwaaʼuujang
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Res: gayéedʼangʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: gayéedʼangʼwaaʼus
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: gayéedʼangʼwaaʼujaa
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: gayéedʼangʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: gayéedʼangʼwaaäsaaʼus
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres: gayéedʼangʼwaaʼahlanggang
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past: gayéedʼangʼwaaʼahlanggan
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: gayéedʼangʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut: gayéedʼangʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel: gayéedʼangʼwaaʼahlans
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past: gayéedʼangʼaawaaʼahlang
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Cont: gayéedʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: gayéedʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Rflx: gayéedʼangʼwaaʼahl
     gayéed+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: gayéedʼangʼwaaäseehl
